District of Columbia statutes.
34-1257.06

Use of cable system by the District during emergencies and disasters.

In the case of an emergency or disaster, the cable operator shall, upon request of the Mayor, the Chairman of the Council, or the Director, make available its facilities to the District for emergency use during the emergency or disaster.

Aug. 21, 1982, D.C. Law 4-142, § 706
as added Oct. 9, 2002, D.C. Law 14-193, § 2(b), 49 DCR 7334